Virginia statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Article 2. Rules of Construction and Definitions.
§ 1-245.
State.

“State,” when applied to a part of the United States, includes any of the 50 states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, the Northern Mariana Islands, and the United States Virgin Islands.

History.

Code 1919, § 5; Code 1950, § 1-13; 1950, p. 23, § 1-13.26; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 49; 2005, c. 839.

§ 1-246.
Stricken language or italics.

Stricken language for deletions and italics for additions or changes may be used in legislative drafts, printed bills, enrolled bills, and printed Acts of Assembly, in an attempt to call attention to amendments to existing acts of the General Assembly. The stricken language and italics shall not be construed as evidence of amendments to acts of the General Assembly.

History.

1950, p. 24, § 1-13.34; 1986, c. 155; 2005, c. 839.

§ 1-247.
Summaries of legislation.

Any legislative summary associated with a bill, joint resolution or resolution, including any summary appearing on the face of such legislation, shall not constitute a part of the legislation considered, agreed to, or enacted, and shall not be used to indicate or infer legislative intent.

History.

1997, c. 375, § 30-19.03:2; 2005, c. 839.

§ 1-248.
Supremacy of federal and state law.

The Constitution and laws of the United States and of the Commonwealth shall be supreme. Any ordinance, resolution, bylaw, rule, regulation, or order of any governing body or any corporation, board, or number of persons shall not be inconsistent with the Constitution and laws of the United States or of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1919, § 5; Code 1950, § 1-13; 1950, p. 22, § 1-13.17; 2005, c. 839.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, §§ 60, 61.

§ 1-249.
Supreme Court.

“Supreme Court”
means the Supreme Court of Virginia.

History.

1975, c. 36, § 1-13.27:2; 2005, c. 839.

§ 1-250.
Swear; sworn.

“Swear”
or

“sworn”

means “affirm” or “affirmed.”

History.

Code 1919, § 5; Code 1950, § 1-13; 1950, p. 23, § 1-13.28; 2005, c. 839.

§ 1-251.
Systems of state highways.

“Systems of state highways”
means all systems of highways within the Commonwealth over which the Commonwealth Transportation Board exercises jurisdiction and control. In context, such words shall apply to the extent, but only to the extent, that the Commonwealth Transportation Board exercises such jurisdiction and control.

History.

1970, c. 136, § 1-13.40; 2005, c. 839.

§ 1-252.
Tier-city.

“Tier-city”
means an incorporated community within a consolidated county that (i) has within defined boundaries a population of 5,000 or more, (ii) has been designated as a tier-city by the General Assembly, and (iii) has both the powers of a town and such additional powers as may be granted tier-cities by the General Assembly. All references in this Code and the acts of the General Assembly to towns shall be deemed references to tier-cities, except to the extent tier-cities may be specifically excluded or where the context requires otherwise.

History.

1984, c. 695, §§ 1-13.28:1, 1-13.28:2; 1989, c. 493; 2005, c. 839.

§ 1-253.
Time zone.

The United States Eastern Standard Time shall be in effect in all parts of the Commonwealth except during the period when the United States Eastern Daylight Time shall be in effect as provided by federal law. This section shall not be construed to be in contravention of federal law, or duly authorized orders of the United States Secretary of Transportation with respect to the time zones of the United States and the application of standard time to interstate commerce and other matters within such zones.

In all laws, statutes, orders, decrees, rules and regulations relating to the time of performance of any act by any officer or agency of the Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof, or relating to the time in which any rights shall accrue or determine, or within which any act shall or shall not be performed by any person subject to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth, and in all public schools, institutions of the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions, and contracts or choses in action made or to be performed in the Commonwealth, it shall be understood and intended that the time applicable thereto or referred to or implied therein shall be the United States Eastern Standard Time, or the United States Eastern Daylight Time, when and during such is in effect.

History.

1946, p. 103; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 5b; 1952, c. 637, § 1-15; 1962, c. 617; 1964, c. 646; 1966, c. 581; 1988, c. 177; 2005, c. 839.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

18 M.J. Time, § 2.

§ 1-254.
Town.

“Town”
means any existing town or an incorporated community within one or more counties which became a town before noon, July 1, 1971, as provided by law or which has within defined boundaries a population of 1,000 or more and which has become a town as provided by law.

History.

Code 1919, § 5; Code 1950, § 1-13; 1950, p. 24, § 1-13.29; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 49; 1995, c. 155; 2005, c. 839.

Cross references.

For definition of “town” under article relating to local government, see Va. Const., Art. VII, § 1.

Law Review.

For note, “Securing a Valid Annexation in Virginia,” see 10 U. Rich. L. Rev. 557 (1976).

§ 1-255.
United States.

“United States” includes the 50 states, the District of Columbia the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, the Northern Mariana Islands and the United States Virgin Islands.

History.

Code 1919, § 5; Code 1950, § 1-13; 1950, p. 24, § 1-13.31; 2005, c. 839.

§ 1-256.
Weights and measurements; metric equivalents.

Words or terms relating to the customary system of weights and measurements include their International System (SI) metric equivalents, but shall not require the posting or publishing of the equivalents along with the customary system of weights and measurements.

History.

1980, c. 465. § 1-15.2; 2005, c. 839.

§ 1-257.
Written; writing; in writing.

“Written,” “writing,” and “in writing” include any representation of words, letters, symbols, numbers, or figures, whether (i) printed or inscribed on a tangible medium or (ii) stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in a perceivable form and whether an electronic signature authorized by Chapter 42.1 (§ 59.1-479 et seq.) of Title 59.1 is or is not affixed.

History.

Code 1919, § 5; Code 1950, § 1-13; 1950, p. 24, § 1-13.32; 1999, c. 145; 2000, c. 995; 2005, c. 839.